California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
The term of office of the members of the board is three years. When the board is first appointed, three members shall be appointed for three years, two members for two years, and two members for one year. Thereafter, appointments shall be for full three-year terms. Vacancies shall be filled for an unexpired term.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 337, Sec. 1.   (SB 513)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

19218.2.

The board shall elect a chairperson, and from time to time any other officers as it may deem advisable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 337, Sec. 1.   (SB 513)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

19218.3.

(a) The board shall meet at the call of its chairperson or the secretary or at the request of any three members of the board. The board shall meet at least once a year.

(b) A quorum of the board shall be five members. A vote of the majority of the members present at a meeting at which there is a quorum shall constitute an act of the board.

(c) No member, or any employee or agent thereof, shall be personally liable for the actions of the board or responsible individually in any way for errors in judgment, mistakes, or other acts, either by commission or omission, except for his or her own individual acts of dishonesty or
 crime.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 337, Sec. 1.   (SB 513)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

19218.4.

(a) The board shall advise the secretary and may make recommendations to the secretary concerning all of the following:

(1) Adoption, modification, and repeal of regulations and procedures.

(2) Procedures for employment, training, supervision, and compensation of inspectors and other personnel.

(3) Rate and collection of license fees and penalties related thereto.

(4) Acquisition and use of equipment.

(5) Posting and noticing changes in bylaws,
 general procedures, or orders.

(6) All matters pertaining to this chapter, including, but not limited to, the inspection and enforcement program, annual budget, necessary fees to provide adequate services, and regulations required to accomplish the purposes of the chapter.

(b) The board shall keep accurate books and records of its activities, which shall be subject to annual audit by an auditing firm approved by the secretary. The audit shall be made a part of an annual report submitted to all persons licensed under this chapter. The books and records shall be available for audit during regular business hours upon request of the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 337, Sec. 1.   (SB 513)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

19218.5.

Persons subject to this chapter shall not have access to any information in the possession of any entity or entities established or designated pursuant to this chapter that would disclose proprietary information regarding any other person subject to this article, including, but not limited to, material test results, individual fee or license payments, rendering process, or formula information.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 337, Sec. 1.   (SB 513)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

19218.6.

(a) The secretary shall adopt regulations to be used by the board to administer this article.

(b) In adopting regulations and procedures, the secretary shall accept the recommendations of the board if he or she finds them to be practicable and in the interest of the rendering industry and the public.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 337, Sec. 1.   (SB 513)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

19218.7.

The secretary shall, within 30 days of receiving a recommendation from the board in accordance with this article, provide the board with notice of the acceptance of the recommendation or with a written statement of the reasons for denial if he or she does not accept the recommendation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 337, Sec. 1.   (SB 513)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Licenses [19220. - 19229.]

19220.

A license granted under this chapter shall expire on December 31 of each year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 393, Sec. 3.   (AB 2612)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

19221.

The application for a license or a renewal of a license shall be accompanied by the license fee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 815.)
-------------------------------------------

19222.

A previous violation of any provision of this chapter is good and sufficient cause for denial of a license.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 815.)
-------------------------------------------

19224.

A proceeding for refusal or revocation of a license shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1, Division 3, Title 2 of the Government Code. The director shall have all the powers granted in that chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 815.)
-------------------------------------------

19225.

Subject to Section 19229, the annual fee for each license held is one hundred dollars ($100).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 134, Sec. 4.   (AB 107)   Effective July 26, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

19226.

A separate license shall be required for each place of business.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 815.)
-------------------------------------------

19227.

(a) In addition to the license fee required pursuant to Section 19225, the department may charge each licensed renderer and collection center an additional fee necessary to cover the reasonable costs of administering Article 6 (commencing with Section 19300) and Article 6.5 (commencing with Section 19310). The additional fees authorized to be imposed by this section shall not exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per year per each licensed rendering plant or collection center.

(b) The secretary may, based upon the findings and recommendation of the Rendering Industry Advisory Board, determine the additional fee amounts necessary to provide the revenue needed to carry out the provisions of this chapter specified in subdivision (a). The secretary and the Rendering
 Industry Advisory Board shall not exceed the maximum amount for additional fees authorized pursuant to subdivision (a). Setting the additional fee or fees shall not be subject to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The secretary shall only have the authority to raise an additional fee pursuant to this section upon recommendation of the Rendering Industry Advisory Board.

(c) The secretary shall fix the additional fee amounts established pursuant to this section and may fix different fees for renderers and collection centers. If an additional fee is imposed on licensed renderers pursuant to subdivision (a) and an additional fee is imposed on registered transporters pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 19315, only one additional fee may be imposed on a person or firm that is both licensed as a renderer pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 19300) and registered as a
 transporter of inedible kitchen grease pursuant to Article 6.5 (commencing with Section 19310), which fee shall be the higher of the two fees.

(d) If the additional fee established pursuant to this section is not paid within one calendar month of the date it is due, a penalty shall be imposed in the amount of 10 percent per annum on the amount of the unpaid fee.

(e) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2030, and, as of January 1, 2031, is repealed, unless a later enacted statute that becomes operative on or before January 1, 2031, deletes or extends the dates on which it becomes inoperative and is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 215, Sec. 1.   (AB 2721)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Inoperative July 1, 2030, by its own provisions.    Repealed as of January 1, 2031, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

19228.

All fees, charges, and collections collected pursuant to Sections 19225, 19227, 19312, and 19315 shall be paid into the State Treasury monthly to the credit of the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund. All fees, charges, and collections collected pursuant to Sections 19225, 19227, 19312, and 19315 shall be used for the enforcement of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 434, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

19229.

If a licensee has two or more licenses in effect at the same meat processing establishment, custom livestock slaughterhouse, place of business, or poultry plant, pursuant to Section 19010, 19011, 19240, 19260, 19280, or 24741, the license fee that is the highest amount shall be paid in full and each additional license fee shall be in an amount that is 50 percent of the fee that would otherwise be applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 134, Sec. 5.   (AB 107)   Effective July 26, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Pet Food and Horse Slaughterers [19240. - 19242.]

19240.

Every person engaged in the business of slaughtering animals for pet food or horses for human food purposes shall first obtain a license pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 815.)
-------------------------------------------

19241.

The application shall be in a form which is prescribed by the director and shall contain the following:

(a) The name and address of the applicant.

(b) Where each slaughterhouse in which he intends to operate is located and to whom it belongs.

(c) The experience the applicant has in slaughtering.

(d) Such other information as the director may, by regulation, require.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 815.)
-------------------------------------------

19242.

The secretary, after notice and hearing, shall refuse to issue a license unless he or she finds that the applicant satisfies all of the following:

(a) Is qualified to operate a slaughterhouse.

(b) Is properly equipped to engage in the business of slaughtering in a clean and sanitary manner.

(c) Has never been convicted of a felony involving adulterated or misbranded food.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 680, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Pet Food Processor [19260. - 19262.]

19260.

Every person engaged in the business of processing, packing, or preparing fresh or frozen horsemeat or any other meat product for use as pet food of any kind, shall first obtain a license pursuant to this chapter, except those persons licensed pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 113025) of Part 6 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 61.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

19261.

The application for a license shall be in a form which is prescribed by the secretary and shall contain the following:

(a) The name and address of the applicant.

(b) Where each processing plant in which he intends to operate is located and to whom it belongs.

(c) The experience the applicant has in processing.

(d) What interest or control the applicant has in any dead animal hauler, rendering plant, or collection center.

(e) Any other information that the secretary may, by regulation, require.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 187, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

19262.

The secretary, after notice and hearing, shall refuse to issue a license unless he or she finds that the applicant satisfies all of the following:

(a) Is qualified to operate a processing plant.

(b) Is properly equipped to engage in the business of processing in a clean and sanitary manner.

(c) Has never been convicted of a felony involving adulterated or misbranded food.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 680, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Horsemeat and Pet Food Importer [19280. - 19282.]

19280.

Every person who engages in the business of importing (distributing or jobbing) fresh or frozen meat, meat byproducts, horsemeat byproducts, poultry meat, or poultry meat byproducts for pet food or horsemeat for human food purposes shall first obtain a license pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 815.)
-------------------------------------------

19281.

The application shall be in a form which is prescribed by the director and shall contain the following:

(a) The name and address of the applicant.

(b) The application for license shall be accompanied by a certificate issued by a federal, state, or local health agency certifying that the slaughtering or processing facilities of the slaughterer or processor of the horsemeat or pet food are operated under sanitary conditions and that the meat, meat byproducts, horsemeat, horsemeat byproducts, poultry meat, or poultry meat byproducts processed or fresh or frozen pet food to be imported conforms to the requirements of this act or the regulations adopted hereunder.

(c) Such other information as the director may, by regulation, require.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 815.)
-------------------------------------------

19282.

The director shall issue a license unless he finds, after notice and hearing, that the applicant has been convicted of a felony involving adulterated or misbranded food or has violated any of the provisions of this chapter or regulations promulgated thereunder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 815.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Renderers [19300. - 19306.]

19300.

Every person engaged in the business of rendering shall obtain a license from the department for each rendering plant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 329, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

19300.5.

Every person engaged in the business of operating a collection center shall obtain a license from the department for each collection center operated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 329, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

19301.

The application for a license shall be in a form which is prescribed by the director and shall contain the following:

(a) The name and address of the applicant.

(b) Where each rendering plant or collection center which he intends to operate is located.

(c) The experience the applicant has in rendering.

(d) Such other information as the director may by regulation require.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 815.)
-------------------------------------------

19302.

(a) The department may refuse to issue a license if the department finds that the applicant does not meet one or more of the following requirements:

(1) The applicant is properly equipped to engage in the business of rendering or operating a collection center. For these purposes, the department shall consult with the rendering industry to determine the equipment that shall be required.

(2) The applicant has never been convicted of a felony involving adulterated or misbranded food.

(3) The applicant has not violated this article or Article 6.5 (commencing
 with Section 19310), or any regulations adopted to implement those provisions.

(b) A person to whom the department refuses to issue a license may appeal to the department within 20 days of the date of receiving notification of the refusal, in the following manner:

(1) The appeal shall be in writing and signed by the appellant or his or her authorized agent and shall state the grounds for the appeal.

(2) A party, at the time of filing the appeal, or within 10 days after filing the appeal, may present written evidence and a written argument to the department.

(3) The department may grant oral arguments upon application made at the time written arguments are made.

(4) If an application to
 present an oral argument is granted, the department shall give written notice of the time and place for the oral argument at least 10 days prior to the date set for the oral argument. This time requirement may be altered by an agreement between the department and the person appealing the refusal to issue the license.

(5) The department shall decide the appeal on any oral or written arguments, briefs, and evidence that the department receives.

(6) The department shall render a written decision within 45 days of the date of appeal, or within 15 days of the date of oral arguments. A copy of the department’s decision shall be delivered or mailed to the appellant.

(7) The department may sustain the decision to refuse to issue a license or reverse that decision.

(8) The appellant may seek a review of the decision of the department pursuant to Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 595, Sec. 2.   (AB 1566)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

19303.

In addition to any other records required to be kept pursuant to this chapter, every licensed renderer shall record and keep for 2 years, in connection with the receipt of kitchen grease which is not intended for human food, all of the following information:

(a) The name, address, and registration number of every transporter of inedible kitchen grease who has delivered that material to the renderer.

(b) The total amount of inedible kitchen grease purchased in each transaction.

(c) The date of each transaction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 533, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

19304.

All records required to be retained pursuant to this chapter shall be maintained for two years at the regular place of business of every renderer and collection center operator licensed pursuant to this article and every transporter registered pursuant to Article 6.5 (commencing with Section 19310). Those records shall be exhibited on demand to any peace officer or authorized employee of the Department of the California Highway Patrol and the Department of Food and Agriculture.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 595, Sec. 3.   (AB 1566)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

19305.

Any peace officer of this state, or any employee of the department, during normal business hours, may inspect any premises maintained by a renderer or collection center operator licensed pursuant to this article or a transporter registered pursuant to Article 6.5 (commencing with Section 19310), and any inedible kitchen grease located on the premises, for the purpose of determining whether that renderer, collection center operator, or transporter is complying with the record maintenance requirements of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 329, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

19305.5.

(a) The department may suspend or revoke a renderer license or collection center license at any time, if it finds any of the following has occurred:

(1) The licensee has sold or offered for sale to an unlicensed person, any inedible kitchen grease.

(2) The licensee has stolen, misappropriated, contaminated, or damaged inedible kitchen grease or containers of inedible kitchen grease.

(3) The licensee has violated any provision of this article or any regulations adopted to implement this article.

(4) The licensee has taken possession of inedible kitchen grease from an unregistered transporter or has knowingly taken possession of inedible kitchen grease that has been stolen.

(b) The licensee may appeal any suspension or revocation decision to the department within 20 days of the date of receiving notification of the suspension or revocation, pursuant to the following procedure:

(1) The appeal shall be in writing and signed by the appellant or his or her authorized agent and shall state the grounds for the appeal.

(2) A party, at the time of filing the appeal, or within 10 days after filing the appeal, may present written evidence and a written argument to the department.

(3) The department may grant oral arguments upon application
 made at the time written arguments are made.

(4) If an application to present an oral argument is granted, the department shall give written notice of the time and place for the oral argument at least 10 days prior to the date set for an oral argument. This time requirement may be altered by an agreement between the department and the person appealing the suspension or revocation of the license.

(5) The department shall decide the appeal on any oral or written arguments, briefs, and evidence that the department receives.

(6) The department shall render a written decision within 45 days of the date of appeal, or within 15 days of the date of oral arguments. A copy of the department’s decision shall be delivered or mailed to the appellant.

(7) The
 department may sustain the suspension or revocation decision or reverse that decision.

(8) The appellant may seek a review of the decision of the department pursuant to Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 595, Sec. 4.   (AB 1566)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

19306.

(a) Any renderer or collection center operator licensed pursuant to this article or transporter registered pursuant to Article 6.5 (commencing with Section 19310) who fails in any respect to keep the written records required by this article, or to set out in that written record any matter required by this article to be set out in the record, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) Every renderer, collection center operator, or transporter who refuses, upon demand of any peace officer or authorized employee of the Department of the California Highway Patrol and the Department of Food and Agriculture, to exhibit any written record required by this article, or who destroys that record within two years after making the final entry of
 any information required by this article, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(c) Any violation of subdivision (a) or (b) is punishable as follows:

(1) For a first offense, by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than 30 days, or by both the fine and imprisonment.

(2) For a second offense within a period of one year, by a fine of not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) or by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than 30 days, or by both the fine and imprisonment. In addition to any other punishment imposed pursuant to this paragraph, the court may order the defendant to stop engaging in the business as a renderer, collection center operator, or transporter for a period not to exceed 30 days.

(3) For a third or any subsequent offense within a period of two years, by a fine of not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than six months, or by both the fine and imprisonment. In addition to any other sentence imposed pursuant to this paragraph, the court shall order the defendant to stop engaging in the business as a renderer, collection center operator, or transporter for a period of 30 days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 595, Sec. 5.   (AB 1566)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6.5. Transporters of Inedible Kitchen Grease [19310. - 19317.]

19310.

(a) It is unlawful for any person or entity to engage in the transportation of inedible kitchen grease without being registered with the department and without being in possession of a valid registration certificate issued by the department.

(b) Each registration shall expire on December 31st each year.

(c) (1) The department shall require, as a condition of registration, that the applicant demonstrate the ability to respond to damages resulting from the transportation of inedible kitchen grease.

(2) The damages to be covered include public liability, which shall include, but not be limited to, liability for personal injury and property damage.

(3) The ability to respond to damages shall be demonstrated by providing proof of a policy of insurance or surety bond for that purpose in an amount not less than two million dollars ($2,000,000), except that the required amount shall be not less that one million dollars ($1,000,000) if the applicant operates only one vehicle and the vehicle has a gross vehicle weight rating of not more than 10,000 pounds.

(4) This subdivision shall not preempt a local ordinance or rule that is more stringent than the provisions of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 533, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

19310.5.

It is unlawful for any person who is not a registered transporter of inedible kitchen grease to transport that product from any place within this state to any place outside the borders of this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 533, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

19310.7.

Any person registered as a transporter of inedible kitchen grease may deliver any inedible kitchen grease to a licensed renderer or collection center for processing or recycling into usable products. As used in this section, “usable products” includes, but is not limited to, biofuels, lubricants, and animal feed, provided the uses for animal feed are permitted by the rules and regulations adopted by the United States Food and Drug Administration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 533, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

19311.

Any renderer who operates vehicles for the purpose of collecting inedible kitchen grease shall register as a transporter of inedible kitchen grease and otherwise comply with this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 533, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

19312.

(a) Registration shall be made with the department and shall include all of the following:

(1) The applicant’s name and address.

(2) A description of the operations to be performed by the applicant.

(3) The vehicles to be used in the transportation.

(4) A registration fee not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

(5) A list of the names of the drivers employed by the transporter who transport inedible kitchen grease subject to this
 article and their drivers’ license numbers.

(6) Any other information that may be required by the department.

(b) Any renderer or collection center that registers pursuant to this article is not required to pay the fee prescribed in this section.

(c) The department may refuse to issue an original or renewal registration certificate to an applicant for either of the following reasons:

(1) The existence of the grounds specified in subdivisions (a) to (e), inclusive, of Section 19314.

(2) A failure to pay, in full by the established due date, any penalty levied by the department for a previous
 violation of this article or Article 6 (commencing with Section 19300).

(d) (1) The applicant may appeal the decision of the department to refuse to register the applicant.

(2) The department shall establish procedures for the appeals process, to include a noticed hearing.

(3) The department may reverse a decision to refuse to register the applicant, upon a finding of good cause to do so.

(e) The department shall adopt regulations that specify the maximum time period for which a refusal of registrations may be imposed, based on the severity or the number of violations that are the basis of the department’s action. The time period for the refusal
 of registration shall not exceed three years from the date the refusal of registration is imposed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 286, Sec. 2.   (AB 655)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

19313.

Every vehicle used in the transportation of inedible kitchen grease shall conspicuously display the name of the owner of the vehicle in letters not less than two inches high.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 699, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

19313.1.

In addition to any other records required to be kept pursuant to this chapter, every transporter of inedible kitchen grease shall record and maintain for two years all of the following:

(a) The name and address of each location from which the transporter obtained the inedible kitchen grease.

(b) The quantity of material received from each location.

(c) The date on which the inedible kitchen grease was obtained from each location.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 533, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

19313.5.

It is unlawful for any person to steal, misappropriate, contaminate, or damage inedible kitchen grease, or containers thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1036, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

19313.8.

A registered transporter or any other person shall not take possession of inedible kitchen grease from an unregistered transporter, an unlicensed collection center, or an unlicensed renderer, or knowingly take possession of stolen inedible kitchen grease.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 595, Sec. 7.   (AB 1566)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

19314.

The department may suspend or revoke a registration certificate, at any time, if it finds any of the following has occurred:

(a) The registrant has sold or offered for sale to an unlicensed person, any inedible kitchen grease.

(b) The registrant has stolen, misappropriated, contaminated, or damaged inedible kitchen grease or containers of inedible kitchen grease.

(c) The registrant has violated this article or any regulations adopted to implement this article.

(d) The registrant has taken possession of inedible
 kitchen grease from an unregistered transporter or has knowingly taken possession of inedible kitchen grease that has been stolen.

(e) The registrant has been found to have engaged in, or aided and abetted another person or entity in the commission of, any violation of a statute, regulation, or order relating to the transportation or disposal of inedible kitchen grease, including a violation of the federal Water Pollution Control Act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq.), the Porter-Cologne Water Quality Control Act (Division 7 (commencing with Section 13000) of the Water Code), Section 5650 of the Fish and Game Code, commercial vehicle weight limits, or commercial vehicle hours of service.

(f) For purposes of this section, “registrant” includes any business entity, trustee, officer, director, partner, person, or other entity holding more than 5 percent equity, ownership, or debt
 liability in the registered entity engaged in the transportation of inedible kitchen grease.

(g) (1) The registrant may appeal the suspension or revocation decision of the department.

(2) The department shall establish procedures for the appeals process, to include a noticed hearing.

(3) The department may reverse a suspension or revocation upon a finding of good cause to do so.

(h) The department shall adopt regulations that specify the maximum time period during which a suspension or revocation of a registration certificate may be imposed, based on the severity or the number of violations that are the basis of the department’s action. The time period for the suspension or revocation of the registration certificate shall not
 exceed three years from the date the suspension or revocation of the registration certificate is imposed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 595, Sec. 8.   (AB 1566)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

19315.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), in addition to the registration fee required by Section 19312, the department may charge a fee necessary to cover the costs of administering this article. Any additional fee charged pursuant to this section shall not exceed five hundred dollars ($500) per year per vehicle that is operated to transport kitchen grease, and shall not exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per year per registered transporter.

(b) The secretary may, based upon the findings and recommendation of the Rendering Industry Advisory Board, determine the specific fee per vehicle necessary to provide the revenue needed to carry out the provisions of this article. The secretary and the Rendering Industry Advisory Board shall not exceed the maximum fee
 amounts established by this section. Setting the fee amounts authorized pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not be subject to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The secretary shall only have the authority to raise an additional fee pursuant to this section upon recommendation of the Rendering Industry Advisory Board.

(c) An individual registered pursuant to this article who transports inedible kitchen grease for the individual’s own personal, noncommercial use as an alternative fuel is exempt from 75 percent of the fee charged pursuant to subdivision (a), and shall meet all of the following requirements:

(1) The individual shall meet all other requirements of this article.

(2) The individual shall not transport more than 55 gallons of inedible kitchen
 grease per load for that purpose, and shall have no more than 165 gallons of inedible kitchen grease in the individual’s possession or control at any time.

(3) The individual shall not take any inedible kitchen grease from a container owned by another registered transporter of inedible kitchen grease or from an inedible kitchen grease provider under contract with a registered transporter of inedible kitchen grease or from a container owned by a renderer or collection center.

(4) The individual shall have a document in the individual’s possession while transporting inedible kitchen grease signed by the responsible party providing the inedible kitchen grease to the individual at the source of the inedible kitchen grease that provides permission for the inedible kitchen grease to be removed from that site.

(5) The
 individual shall specify where the inedible kitchen grease is stored and processed as an alternative fuel, if that address is different from the address included on the registration form for that individual pursuant to Section 19312.

(6) The individual shall not sell, barter, or trade any inedible kitchen grease.

(d) The secretary shall fix the additional fees established pursuant to this section and may fix different fees for transporters of inedible kitchen grease and collection centers, and for transporters of interceptor grease. If an additional fee is imposed on licensed renderers pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 19227 and an additional fee is imposed on registered transporters pursuant to subdivision (a) of this section, only one additional fee may be imposed on a person or firm that is both licensed as a renderer pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 19300)
 and registered as a transporter of inedible kitchen grease pursuant to this article, which fee shall be the higher of the two fees.

(e) If the additional fee established pursuant to this section is not paid within one calendar month of the date it is due, a penalty shall be imposed in the amount of 10 percent per annum on the amount of the unpaid fee.

(f) For purposes of this section, “interceptor grease” means inedible kitchen grease that is principally derived from food preparation, processing, or waste, and that is removed from a grease trap or grease interceptor.

(g) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2030, and, as of January 1, 2031, is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, which becomes effective on or before January 1, 2031, deletes or extends the dates on which it becomes inoperative and is
 repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 215, Sec. 2.   (AB 2721)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Inoperative July 1, 2030, by its own provisions.    Repealed as of January 1, 2031, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

19316.

It is the purpose of this article to prevent the sale and transfer of illegally obtained inedible kitchen grease, to protect the environment, to reduce blockages of public sewer systems, and to prevent the improper and illegal transportation and disposal of inedible kitchen grease.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 533, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

19316.5.

The department is authorized to establish a system for documenting and tracking the transportation of inedible kitchen grease in order to ensure the proper disposal or recycling of that material.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 533, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

19317.

A registered transporter of inedible kitchen grease shall, whenever any contract for the transportation of inedible kitchen grease under which that transporter provides transportation services is terminated or expires, notify the county health officer for the county in which the inedible kitchen grease was collected of the termination or expiration of the contract and that the registered transporter is no longer transporting inedible kitchen grease pursuant to that contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 929, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Dead Animal Haulers [19320. - 19322.]

19320.

All persons engaged in the business of hauling of dead cattle, sheep, swine, goats, horses or other large domesticated animals or parts of the carcasses of any animal that died otherwise than by slaughter shall be licensed by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 815.)
-------------------------------------------

19321.

The application for a license shall be in a form which is prescribed by the director and shall contain the following:

(a) The name and address of the applicant.

(b) All vehicles that are to be registered pursuant to Section 19354.

(c) Such other information as the director may by regulation require.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 815.)
-------------------------------------------

19322.

The secretary, after notice and hearing, may refuse to issue a license unless he finds that the applicant:

(a) Is properly equipped to engage in the business of dead animal hauling.

(b) Has never been convicted of a felony involving adulterated or misbranded food.

(c) Demonstrates character, responsibility, and good faith suitable for carrying on the business to be licensed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 187, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. General Provisions [19340. - 19358.]

19340.

No slaughterer shall own or control directly or indirectly, through stock ownership or control or otherwise, by himself or through his agents or employees, any interest in a person or company licensed to haul dead animals by Section 19320 unless his slaughterhouse is under state or federal inspection.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 815.)
-------------------------------------------

19342.
